apertium-eng.eng.dix
<pardef n="d/ie__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ied</l>       <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>ying</l>      <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>ying</l>      <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>ying</l>      <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ies</l>       <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ied</l>       <r>ie<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="d/ig__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ig</l>        <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ig</l>        <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ug</l>        <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>igging</l>    <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>igging</l>    <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>igging</l>    <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ig</l>        <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>igs</l>       <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ug</l>        <r>ig<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="d/ive__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ive</l>       <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ive</l>       <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ived</l>      <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>iving</l>     <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>iving</l>     <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>iving</l>     <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ive</l>       <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ives</l>      <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ived</l>      <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ove</l>       <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="dr/aw__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>aw</l>        <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aw</l>        <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>awn</l>       <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>awing</l>     <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>awing</l>     <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>awing</l>     <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aw</l>        <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aws</l>       <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ew</l>        <r>aw<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="dr/ink__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ink</l>       <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ink</l>       <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unk</l>       <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>inking</l>    <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>inking</l>    <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>inking</l>    <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ink</l>       <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inks</l>      <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ank</l>       <r>ink<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="dr/ive__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ive</l>       <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ive</l>       <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iven</l>      <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>iving</l>     <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>iving</l>     <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>iving</l>     <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ive</l>       <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ives</l>      <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ove</l>       <r>ive<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="spel/l__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>l</l>         <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>l</l>         <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>led</l>       <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>ling</l>      <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>ling</l>      <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>ling</l>      <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>l</l>         <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ls</l>        <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>led</l>       <r>l<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/eat__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>eat</l>       <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eat</l>       <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eaten</l>     <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>eating</l>    <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>eating</l>    <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>eating</l>    <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eat</l>       <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eats</l>      <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ate</l>       <r>eat<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="fe/el__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>el</l>        <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>el</l>        <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lt</l>        <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>eling</l>     <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>eling</l>     <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>eling</l>     <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>el</l>        <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>els</l>       <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lt</l>        <r>el<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="f/ight__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ight</l>      <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ight</l>      <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ought</l>     <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="1"> <p><l>ighting</l>   <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="3"> <p><l>ighting</l>   <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e w="2"> <p><l>ighting</l>   <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ight</l>      <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ights</l>     <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ought</l>     <r>ight<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="eat">             <i></i><par n="/eat__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="eat a horse">     <i></i><par n="/eat__vblex"/><p><l><b/>a<b/>horse</l><r><g><b/>a<b/>horse</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="eat supper">      <i></i><par n="/eat__vblex"/><p><l><b/>supper</l><r><g><b/>supper</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="befall">          <i>befal</i><par n="spel/l__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="blight">          <i>bl</i><par n="f/ight__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="die">             <i>d</i><par n="d/ie__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dig">             <i>d</i><par n="d/ig__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="draw">            <i>dr</i><par n="dr/aw__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="drink like a fish"><i>dr</i><par n="dr/ink__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="drive">           <i>dr</i><par n="dr/ive__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="draw close">      <i>dr</i><par n="dr/aw__vblex"/><p><l><b/>close</l><r><g><b/>close</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="draw lots">       <i>dr</i><par n="dr/aw__vblex"/><p><l><b/>lots</l><r><g><b/>lots</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="drink like a fish"><i>dr</i><par n="dr/ink__vblex"/><p><l><b/>like<b/>a<b/>fish</l><r><g><b/>like<b/>a<b/>fish</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="fight">           <i>f</i><par n="f/ight__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="feel">            <i>fe</i><par n="fe/el__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="feel ashamed">    <i>fe</i><par n="fe/el__vblex"/><p><l><b/>ashamed</l><r><g><b/>ashamed</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="feel chilly">     <i>fe</i><par n="fe/el__vblex"/><p><l><b/>chilly</l><r><g><b/>chilly</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="feel like">       <i>fe</i><par n="fe/el__vblex"/><p><l><b/>like</l><r><g><b/>like</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="feel remorse">    <i>fe</i><par n="fe/el__vblex"/><p><l><b/>remorse</l><r><g><b/>remorse</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="foretell">        <i>foretel</i><par n="spel/l__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kneel">           <i>kne</i><par n="fe/el__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="knell">           <i>knel</i><par n="spel/l__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lie">             <i>l</i><par n="d/ie__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mis-spell">       <i>mis-spel</i><par n="spel/l__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="miscall">         <i>miscal</i><par n="spel/l__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="overdraw">        <i>overdr</i><par n="dr/aw__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="overfill">        <i>overfil</i><par n="spel/l__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="redraw">          <i>redr</i><par n="dr/aw__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="smell">           <i>smel</i><par n="spel/l__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="spell">           <i>spel</i><par n="spel/l__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="spill">           <i>spil</i><par n="spel/l__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="swell">           <i>swel</i><par n="spel/l__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tie">             <i>t</i><par n="d/ie__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tie in a bundle"> <i>t</i><par n="d/ie__vblex"/><p><l><b/>in<b/>a<b/>bundle</l><r><g><b/>in<b/>a<b/>bundle</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="tie into faggots"><i>t</i><par n="d/ie__vblex"/><p><l><b/>into<b/>faggots</l><r><g><b/>into<b/>faggots</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="tie up">          <i>t</i><par n="d/ie__vblex"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="untie">           <i>unt</i><par n="d/ie__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vie">             <i>v</i><par n="d/ie__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wall">            <i>wal</i><par n="spel/l__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="withdraw">        <i>withdr</i><par n="dr/aw__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="yell">            <i>yel</i><par n="spel/l__vblex"/></e>
